Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.79.440 and 2025 c 58 s 5028 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department or board may not post information regarding an enforcement action taken by the board against a person ((licensed))credentialed under this chapter or chapter 18.88A RCW, including any supporting documents or indication that the enforcement action was taken, on any public website when the following conditions are met:(a) In connection with the enforcement action, the person has been required by an order or agreement with the board to contact a board-approved substance use disorder monitoring program authorized by RCW 18.130.175, and if recommended by the program, to contract with and participate in the program;(b) The board has found that the person has substantially complied with the terms of the order or agreement; and(c) If the website is a third-party website, the department or board has the ability to prevent information regarding the enforcement action from being posted on the public website.(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the board shall establish a stipend program to defray the out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with participation in the board's approved substance use disorder monitoring program authorized by RCW 18.130.175.(3) To be eligible for the stipend program, a person must:(a) Hold an active, inactive, or suspended ((license))credential issued pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.88A RCW;(b) Submit an application on forms provided by the board;(c) Be actively participating in the board's approved substance use disorder monitoring program or have completed the board's approved substance use disorder monitoring program within six months of submission of an application for the stipend program; and(d) Have a demonstrated need for financial assistance with the expenses incurred in connection with participation in the board's approved substance use disorder monitoring program.(4) A person is not eligible for the stipend program if they have previously applied for and participated in the stipend program.(5) The board may defray up to 80 percent of each out-of-pocket expense deemed eligible for defrayment under this section.(6) Out-of-pocket expenses eligible for defrayment under this section include the costs of substance use evaluation, treatment, and other ancillary services, including drug testing, participation in professional peer support groups, and any other expenses deemed appropriate by the board.(7) A person participating in the stipend program established in this section shall document their out-of-pocket expenses in a manner specified by the board.(8) The board must provide updated information on its website regarding the total number of individuals that have participated in the stipend program, the average total amount of eligible expenses defrayed for each participant, the aggregated total amount of expenses that have been defrayed for all individuals that have participated in the stipend program, and the amount of funds available for the stipend program.(9) ((The board shall establish the stipend program no later than July 1, 2024.(10))) The board may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---